Tennessee, session 114, HB2670.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Section 7(b) of Chapter 33 of the Private Acts of 1985, as amended by
Chapter 85 of the Private Acts of 2004, and any other acts amendatory thereto, is amended by
deleting:
For the term beginning in August 2004, the compensation for the mayor will be
two hundred dollars ($200) per month; and the compensation for each alderman shall be
one hundred dollars ($100) per month.
and substituting instead:
For the term beginning in December 2028, the compensation for the mayor is
four hundred dollars ($400) per month; and the compensation for each alderman is two
hundred dollars ($200) per month.
SECTION 2. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote
of the legislative body of the City of Gleason. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed
by the presiding officer of the legislative body and certified to the secretary of state.
SECTION 3. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act, it shall
be effective upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, it shall
become effective as provided in Section 2.
HB2670
018227
- 1 -